Washington statutes.
RCW 36.16.100

Offices to be open certain days and hours.

All county and precinct offices shall be kept open for the transaction of business during such days and hours as the board of county commissioners shall by resolution prescribe.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.16.100. Prior: 1955 ex.s. c 9 s 2; prior: 1951 c 100 s 1; 1941 c 113 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 9963-1, part.]